Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-423
Court-martial; trial counsel; defense counsel; detail.

(1) For each court-martial the authority convening the court shall detail trial counsel and defense counsel, and such assistants as he considers appropriate. No person who has acted as investigating officer, military judge, or court member in any case may act later as trial counsel, assistant trial counsel, or, unless expressly requested by the accused, as defense counsel or assistant defense counsel in the same case. No person who has acted for the prosecution may act later in the same case for the defense, nor may any person who has acted for the defense act later in the same case for the prosecution.

(2) Trial counsel or defense counsel detailed for a court-martial:

(a) Must be a judge advocate of the military forces, who is a graduate of an accredited law school and a member of the bar of the Supreme Court of Nebraska, or must be a member of the bar of a federal court or of the highest court of a state; and

(b) Must be certified as competent to perform such duties by the State Judge Advocate.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 23, p. 1565.